src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ############################## !
!! # Livvi Karelian numerals 
! ############################## !

!! # Numeral inflection
!! Numeral inflection is like nominal, except that numerals compound in all
!! forms which requires great amount of care in the inflection patterns.
! FIXME: compounding

! nominatives


!LEXICON NUM_CASE
!+Gen:^WGStem%>n NUM_K ;
!+All:^WGStem%>le NUM_K ;
!+Abl:^WGStem%>lp%{aä%}i NUM_K ;
!+Ela:^WGStem%>st%{aä%} NUM_K ;
!+Ade:^WGStem%>l NUM_K ;

!LEXICON NUM_K
!K ;
!ARABICCOMPOUNDS ;


LEXICON ARABICCOMPOUNDS   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ! 1-osainen
+Use/NG: RHyph ; ! 3-





!  Collection numbers
! ---------------


!LEXICON COLLTAG
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:%>idie            # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:%>idie            # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Ine:%>inie            # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie # ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie # ;
!             +N+Coll+Ess:%>inie            # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot
          +Sg+Nom: MARKDOT ;
          +Sg+Gen: MARKDOT ;
          +Sg+Acc: MARKDOT ;


LEXICON dateyearcase_fullsuff
          +Sg+Gen:%:n  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen:n  #      ;
          +Sg+Ine:%:ssa  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ine:ssa   #      ;
          +Sg+Ela:%:sta  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ela:sta   #      ;
          +Sg+Ill:%:iin  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:iin    #      ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:%-   ENDLEX ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:%–   ENDLEX ;




!LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  to distinguish between 0 and oblique
!  ARABICCASE0 ;
!  ARABICCASE  ;

LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 DIGITCASES ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
   DIGITCASE ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
   DIGITCASE0 ;

LEXICON DIGITCASES
 DIGITCASES ;
 DIGITCASE0 ;


LEXICON DIGITCASE0
      +Sg+Nom: # ;
!      +Arab+Sg+Nom: # ;
  +Cmp/SplitR:%:%- ENDLEX ;


LEXICON DIGITCASE
        +Arab+Sg+Gen:n       # ;
        +Arab+Sg+Ill:iin      # ;
        +Arab+Sg+Ine:ssa     # ; ! NRK:sne
        +Arab+Sg+Ela:sta     # ; ! NRK:ste
        +Arab+Sg+All:lla     # ; ! NRK:sne
        +Arab+Sg+Abl:lta     # ; ! NRK:ste
           +Arab+Ess:ina     # ; ! NBR:ine
        +Arab+Pl+Nom:t       # ;
        +Arab+Pl+Gen:ien       # ;
        +Arab+Pl+Ill:ihin     # ;
        +Arab+Pl+Ine:issa    # ;
        +Arab+Pl+Ela:ista    # ;
        +Arab+Pl+All:illa    # ;
        +Arab+Pl+Abl:ilta    # ;
        +Arab+Pl+Com:ine     # ;
!ordinals

LEXICON ARABICCASEORD
      +Arab+Sg+Nom:%>s       # ;
      +Arab+Sg+Gen:%>nnen      # ;
      +Arab+Sg+Ill:%>nteen    # ;
      +Arab+Sg+Ine:%>nnessa   # ;
      +Arab+Sg+Ela:%>nnesta   # ;
      +Arab+Sg+Ess:%>ntena    # ;
      +Arab+Pl+Nom:%>nnet       # ;
      +Arab+Pl+Gen:%>nsien       # ;
      +Arab+Pl+Ill:%>nsiin    # ;
      +Arab+Pl+Ine:%>nsissa    # ;
      +Arab+Pl+Ela:%>nsista  # ;
      +Arab+Pl+Com:%>nnine # ;

!LEXICON ARABICCASECOLL
! +Arab+Pl+Nom:%>t       # ;
!! +Arab+Pl+Acc:%>sidie    # ;
!! +Arab+Pl+Gen:%>si       # ;
!! +Arab+Pl+Ill:%>sidie    # ;
!! +Arab+Pl+Ine:%>sinie    # ;
!! +Arab+Pl+Ela:%>sijstie  # ;
!! +Arab+Pl+Com:%>sigujmie # ;
!!    +Arab+Ess:%>sinie    # ;

LEXICON ARABICCASEORD-ERR
ARABICCASEORD ; ! XXX look at this
      





LEXICON yeartagpl
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Nom:        # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Gen:        # ;
! +Num+Sem/Year+Err/Orth+Pl+Ine:%:dinie # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase
      +Sg+Nom:        #      ;
      +Sg+Gen:n       #      ;
      +Sg+Ill:iin      #      ;
      +Sg+Ine:ssa     #      ; ! NRK:sne
      +Sg+Ela:sta     #      ; ! NRK:ste
         +Ess:ine     #      ; ! NBR:ine
      +Pl+Nom:t       #      ;
      +Pl+Gen:ien       #      ;
      +Pl+Ill:isiin     #      ;
      +Pl+Ine:issa     #      ;
      +Pl+Ela:ista    #      ;
      +Pl+Com:ine #      ;
  +Cmp/SplitR:%-      ENDLEX ;
  +Cmp/SplitR:%–      ENDLEX ;


LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL !
      +Rom+Sg+Gen:n   # ; ! But here 123a 123
      +Rom+Sg+Ill:iin  # ;
      +Rom+Sg+Ine:ssa # ;
      +Rom+Sg+Ela:sta # ;
      +Rom+Sg+Com:ine # ;
      +Rom+Sg+Ess:ina # ;
