src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!! Numerals
!  --------
!! Numerals in the Livvi Karelian language are numbers.


LEXICON Numerals 
!! Numerals have been split in three sections, the compounding parts
!! of cardinals and ordinals, and the non-compounding ones:
!!€gt-norm: Numeral
!!€ kaksikymmentäkolmetuhatta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom#kymmenen+Num+Sg+Par#kolme+Num+Sg+Nom#tuhat+Num+Sg+Par ! 23,000
!!€ kakskymmentäkolmetuhatta: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom#kymmenen+Num+Sg+Par#kolme+Num+Sg+Nom#tuhat+Num+Sg+Par
!!€ kahđessađasneljes: kahđes+A+Ord+Sg+Nom#sađas+A+Ord+Sg+Nom#neljes+A+Ord+Sg+Nom  ! 204rd
!!€ viitisenkymmentä: viitisen+Num#kymmentä  ! 50-ish

!0    NUM_CARD_ALL    ;
!0    NUM_ORD_ALL ;
!0    NUM_OTHERS  ;

  ARABICS ;          ! for the arabic numerals        !
! +Use/Circ: ARABICS ;          ! for the arabic numerals        !
  ROMAN ;           ! for the roman numerals         !
! +Use/Circ: ROMAN ;           ! for the roman numerals         !
  NUM-PREFIXES ;    ! for §34 etc.                   !
! +Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES ;    ! for §34 etc.                   !
  ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                     !
! +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                     !



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
